Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 45.2-2100.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Authority”
means the Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium Authority established pursuant to this chapter.

“Board”
means the board of directors of the Authority.

“Consortium”
means the Virginia Nuclear Energy Consortium established by the Authority pursuant to §

45.2-2105

.

“Member”
means a member of the Consortium.

History.

2013, cc. 57, 394, § 67-1400; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1 2021.

§ 45.2-2101.
Nuclear energy; strategic plan.

The Department and the Secretaries of Commerce and Trade and Education shall work in coordination with the Authority, established pursuant to Article 2 (§

45.2-2102

), and the Virginia Economic Development Partnership Authority, established pursuant to Article 4 (§

2.2-2234

et seq.) of Chapter 22 of Title 2.2, to develop a strategic plan for nuclear energy as part of the Commonwealth’s overall goal of carbon-free energy.

Such plan may include (i) the promotion of new technologies and opportunities for innovation, including advanced manufacturing; (ii) the establishment of a collaborative research center and university nuclear leadership program to promote education in fields that meet the workforce demands of Virginia’s nuclear industry; and (iii) recognition of the role of nuclear energy in the Commonwealth’s goal of employing 100 percent carbon-free sources of energy by 2050.

Such plan shall be completed by October 1, 2020, updated every four years thereafter, and published on the Internet by the Authority.

History.

2020, cc. 657, 658, § 67-1700; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.